Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2142.01
Validity and enforceability of bonds and agreements; presumption.

(1) In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of a city, village, or authority or the security therefor brought after the lapse of thirty days after the issuance of such bonds has been authorized, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been authorized by the city, village, or authority to aid in financing a redevelopment project shall be conclusively deemed to have been authorized for such purpose and such redevelopment project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the purposes and provisions of the Community Development Law.

(2) In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any agreement of a city, village, or authority brought after the lapse of thirty days after the agreement has been formally entered into, any such agreement reciting in substance that it has been entered into by the city, village, or authority to provide financing for an approved redevelopment project shall be conclusively deemed to have been entered into for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the purposes and provisions of the Community Development Law.

Laws 1997, LB 875, § 16;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 30.

Subsection (2) of this section requires that a party wishing to challenge a contract that provides financing for an approved redevelopment project initiate any suit, action, or challenge within 30 days of the party's formally entering into the contract; after 30 days, the project shall be conclusively deemed to have complied with Nebraska's community development laws. Community Dev. Agency v. PRP Holdings, 277 Neb. 1015, 767 N.W.2d 68 (2009).